zh-TW: 套組組件: 內附手提袋/收納盒; 僅含主桿; 完整套組 (主桿 + 2 根手桿); 內附握把帶; 僅含一對手桿; 單根手桿 (替換用); 其他
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto: Saco/estojo de transporte incluído; Apenas o bastão central; Conjunto completo (bastão central + 2 bastões de mão); Fita de aderência incluída; Apenas par de bastões de mão; Bastão de mão único (substituição); Outro
ja: セット内容: キャリーバッグ/ケース付属; センタースティックのみ; コンプリートセット (センタースティック + ハンドスティック 2 本); グリップテープ付属; ハンドスティックペアのみ; シングルハンドスティック (交換用); その他
en: Set components: Carrying bag/case included; Center stick only; Complete set (center stick + 2 hand sticks); Grip tape included; Hand sticks pair only; Single hand stick (replacement); Other
tr: Bileşenleri ayarlayın: Taşıma çantası/kılıfı dahil; Sadece orta çubuk; Tam set (orta çubuk + 2 el çubuğu); Kavrama bandı dahil; Sadece el çubuğu çifti; Tek el çubuğu (yedek); Diğer
bg-BG: Компоненти на комплекта: Включена чанта/кальф за носене; Само централна пръчка; Пълен комплект (централна пръчка + 2 ръчни пръчки); Включена лента за захват (грип); Само чифт ръчни пръчки; Единична ръчна пръчка (резервна); Друго
es: Componentes del set: Incluye bolsa de transporte/estuche; Solo palo central; Juego completo (palo central + 2 palos de mano); Cinta de agarre incluida; Solo par de palos de mano; Palo de mano individual (repuesto); Otro
th: ส่วนประกอบชุด: มีกระเป๋า/กล่องใส่ให้; เฉพาะแกนกลาง; ครบชุด (แกนกลาง + ไม้ควบคุม 2 อัน); มีกริปเทปให้; เฉพาะไม้ควบคุมหนึ่งคู่; ไม้ควบคุมอันเดียว (อะไหล่); อื่นๆ
vi: Bộ linh kiện: Kèm túi/hộp đựng; Chỉ có gậy giữa; Bộ hoàn chỉnh (gậy giữa + 2 gậy tay); Kèm băng quấn tay cầm; Chỉ có cặp gậy tay; Gậy tay đơn (thay thế); Khác
lt-LT: Rinkinio komponentai: Pridėtas nešiojimo krepšys / dėklas; Tik centrinė lazdelė; Visas rinkinys (centrinė lazdelė ir 2 rankų lazdelės); Pridėta sukibimo juosta; Tik rankų lazdelių pora; Viena rankų lazdelė (pakaitinė); Kita
de: Setbestandteile: Inklusive Tragetasche/Koffer; Nur Mittelstock; Komplettset (Mittelstock + 2 Handstöcke); Inklusive Griffband; Nur Handstock-Paar; Einzelner Handstock (Ersatz); Andere
fi: Pakkauksen osat: Kantolaukku/-kotelo mukana; Vain keskikeppi; Täydellinen setti (keskikeppi + 2 ohjauskeppiä); Grippiteippi mukana; Vain ohjauskepit (pari); Yksittäinen ohjauskeppi (varaosa); Muu
ko: 세트 구성품: 휴대용 가방/케이스 포함; 센터 스틱만; 풀 세트(센터 스틱 + 핸드 스틱 2개); 그립 테이프 포함; 핸드 스틱 한 쌍만; 단일 핸드 스틱(교체용); 기타
el: Μέρη του σετ: Περιλαμβάνεται τσάντα/θήκη μεταφοράς; Μόνο κεντρική ράβδος; Πλήρες σετ (κεντρική ράβδος + 2 μπαγκέτες χειρός); Περιλαμβάνεται ταινία λαβής (grip tape); Μόνο ζευγάρι μπαγκέτες χειρός; Μονή μπαγκέτα χειρός (ανταλλακτικό); Άλλο
cs: Sada komponent: Včetně přenosné tašky/pouzdra; Pouze středová hůlka; Kompletní sada (středová hůlka + 2 vodicí hůlky); Včetně omotávky; Pouze pár vodicích hůlek; Jedna vodicí hůlka (náhradní); Jiné
da: Sættets komponenter: Bæretaske/-etui medfølger; Kun midterstok; Komplet sæt (midterstok + 2 håndstokke); Griptape medfølger; Kun sæt med håndstokke; Enkelt håndstok (reservedel); Andet
sk-SK: Komponenty sady: Vrátane prenosnej tašky/puzdra; Iba stredová palica; Kompletná súprava (stredová palica + 2 ručné palice); Vrátane omotávky; Len pár ručných palíc; Samostatná ručná palica (náhrada); Iné
zh-CN: 套装组成产品: 内含便携袋/盒; 仅中心棍; 全套（中心棍 + 2 根手棍）; 附带防滑带; 仅一对拨棍; 单根手棍（替换装）; 其他
nb: Settkomponenter: Bæreveske/-etui inkludert; Kun midtpinne; Komplett sett (midtpinne + 2 håndpinner); Griptape inkludert; Kun par med håndpinner; Enkel håndpinne (erstatning); Annet
sl-SI: Komponente kompleta: Vključena torba/kovček za prenašanje; Samo sredinska palica; Celoten komplet (sredinska palica in 2 ročni palici); Vključen trak za oprijem; Samo par ročnih palic; Enojna ročna palica (nadomestna); Drugo
it: Componenti del set: Borsa/Custodia per il trasporto inclusa; Solo bastone centrale; Set completo (bastone centrale + 2 bacchette); Nastro grip incluso; Solo coppia di bacchette; Bacchetta singola (ricambio); Altro
pl: Elementy zestawu: W zestawie torba/pokrowiec; Tylko kijek centralny; Kompletny zestaw (kijek centralny + 2 kijki do rąk); W zestawie owijka; Tylko para kijków do rąk; Pojedynczy kijek do ręki (zapasowy); Inne
hu: Készlet komponensei: Hordtáska / Tok mellékelve; Csak középső bot; Teljes készlet (középső bot + 2 kézi bot); Markolatszalag mellékelve; Csak egy pár kézi bot; Egyetlen kézi bot (csere); Egyéb
ro-RO: Componente ale setului: Geantă/husă de transport inclusă; Doar bățul central; Set complet (băț central + 2 bețe de mână); Bandă anti-alunecare inclusă; Doar pereche de bețe de mână; Un singur băț de mână (rezervă); Altele
sv: Setkomponenter: Bärväska/fodral ingår; Endast mittstav; Komplett set (mittstav + 2 handstavar); Grepptejp ingår; Endast par med handstavar; En handstav (reservdel); Övrigt
pt-BR: Conjunto componentes: Bolsa/estojo de transporte incluído; Apenas bastão central; Conjunto completo (bastão central + 2 bastões de mão); Fita de aderência (grip) incluída; Apenas par de bastões de mão; Bastão de mão único (reposição); Outros
hr-HR: Komponente seta: Uključena je torba / futrola za nošenje; Samo središnji štap; Kompletan set (središnji štap i 2 ručna štapa); Uključena grip traka; Samo par ručnih štapova; Jedan ručni štap (zamjenski); Ostalo
fr: Composants de l’ensemble: Sac/mallette de transport inclus; Bâton central uniquement; Ensemble complet (bâton central + 2 baguettes); Bande antidérapante incluse; Paire de baguettes uniquement; Baguette individuelle (remplacement); Autre
ru: Компоненты набора: Сумка/чехол в комплекте; Только центральная палочка; Полный набор (центральная и 2 ручные палочки); Лента для обмотки в комплекте; Только пара ручных палочек; Одна ручная палочка (запасная); Другое
nl: Set onderdelen: Inclusief draagtas/koffer; Alleen middenstok; Complete set (middenstok + 2 handstokken); Inclusief griptape; Alleen paar handstokken; Enkele handstok (vervanging); Overig